District of Columbia statutes.
49-406

Organized militia; volunteer service; designation.

The organized militia shall be composed of volunteers, and shall be designated the National Guard of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 774, ch. 328, § 10
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 629, ch. 146, § 10
1981 Ed., § 39-106.
1973 Ed., § 39-106.